North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-10.2 Midwestern Regional Higher Education Compact [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 28, § 13, effective June 30, 2017.

15-10.2-01.
Midwestern regional higher education compact. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 3, § 24; repealed by 2017, ch. 28, § 13, effective June 30, 2017.

15-10.2-02.
Midwestern higher education commission — Terms — Vacancies. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 3, § 24; 2009, ch. 482, § 97; repealed by 2017, ch. 28, § 13, effective June 30, 2017.